Utah statutes.
58-69-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501:

(1)  administering anesthesia or analgesia in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene if the individual does not hold a current permit issued by the division authorizing that individual to administer the type of anesthesia or analgesia used;

(2)  practice of dental hygiene by a licensed dental hygienist when not under the supervision of a dentist in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; or

(3)  directing or interfering with a licensed dentist's judgment and competent practice of dentistry.

